dictsource/lt_rules
	α	'alfa_
	β	b;'eta_
	γ	g'a:ma_
	δ	d;'elta_
	ε	'eps;ilon_
	ζ	z;'eta_
	η	eta_
	θ	t;eta_
	ι	jota_
	κ	k'apa_
	λ	l;'amda_
	μ	m;'i_
	ν	n;'i_
	ξ	ks;'i_
	ο	'om;ikron_

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

	π	p;'i:_
	ρ	r'o_
	σ	s;'igma_
	ς	s;'igma_
	τ	t'aU_
	υ	'ips;ilon_
	φ	f;'i_
	χ	x;'i_
	ψ	ps;'i_
	ω	om'ega_
        
        
.group
            '
            ,           _:kabl;'el;is
            !           _:Saukt'Ukas
            ! (\!
            :            d;v;'ItaS;k;is
        D_) : (_DD_             // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
            $            d'o:l;er;is
//            &            _
            =            l;'i:gu
            !=           n;el;'i:gu
            >=           daug;'au_arb'A_l;i:gu
            <=           maZ;'au_arb'A_li:gu
          

        __) - (_D        minus
        A_) - (_D        _
        C_) - (_D        _

      \#\#) # (_        _::
        \#) #

            . (.        _:
            .           _:t'aSkas
        \.) .
